Washington statutes.
RCW 36.74.070

Debts and obligations.

The city or county must assume and agree to provide for the payment of all of the indebtedness of the transportation benefit district, including the payment and retirement of outstanding general obligation and revenue bonds issued by the transportation benefit district.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 307.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 46.68.395.